California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
A licensed broker who accepts funds from others in connection with any transaction subject to this article who does not, as soon as possible, place those funds into a neutral escrow depository, shall place the funds into a trust fund account maintained by the broker in some bank or recognized depository and shall retain all the funds in the account until the broker makes a disbursement of the funds in accordance with written instructions from the person entrusting the money. The written instructions shall also set forth the specific purposes for which the broker may use money deposited with him or her. If the broker wishes to use money from the deposit for a purpose not included in the written instructions, the broker shall first obtain the written consent of the person entrusting the money specifically authorizing the use proposed by the broker for the money. The written consent may be given to the broker by a letter or facsimile. A separate record shall be maintained of all moneys received subject to this section and shall further indicate the disposition thereof. Any funds received by a licensed salesperson shall be delivered by the salesperson to the broker under whom the salesperson is at the time licensed.

As used in this section, “neutral escrow” means an escrow business conducted by a person licensed under Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Financial Code or by any person described by subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 17006 of the Financial Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 508, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

715.

Within one month after the closing of a transaction in which title to a yacht is conveyed from a seller to a purchaser through a licensed broker, the licensee shall provide, or cause to be provided to the seller and purchaser, a closing statement in writing of the selling price thereof, including all charges and credits which shall be itemized, and in the event an exchange of yachts is involved, the information shall include a description of the yachts and amount of added money consideration, if any. The licensee shall affix his or her signature to the closing statement to attest to the facts provided in the closing statement. If the transaction is closed through escrow and the escrowholder renders a closing statement which reveals the information, that shall be deemed compliance with this section on the part of the licensed broker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 475, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

716.

(a) No broker shall engage in any transaction for which a license is required under this article without first obtaining a signed written authorization to do so from the broker’s principal. An authorization to sell shall contain a description of the vessel, including the undocumented vessel’s registration number or the name, official number, and home port if the vessel is documented with a federal agency. The written authorization shall also state the type of listing, the gross listing price, the agreed upon commission or other compensation of the broker, and any repairs authorized to be made.

(b) An offer to purchase shall contain the description of the yacht, including the undocumented vessel’s registration number or the name, official number, and home port if the vessel is documented with a federal agency. The written authorization to purchase shall also state the amount of deposit, terms of the sale, and any contingencies or conditions under which a deposit shall not be returned if the sale is not completed.

(c) When a broker prepares, or there is prepared on behalf of a broker, a written authorization to sell or purchase, the broker shall deliver a copy of the written authorization to the person executing it. Receipt of the copy shall be made on the face of the original written authorization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 561, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

717.

Application for a license as a broker shall be made on forms prescribed by the department and shall be signed by the applicant. The application shall be accompanied by the broker license examination fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

718.

Application for a license as a salesman shall be made on forms prescribed by the department and shall be signed by the applicant and by the employing broker. The application shall be accompanied by the salesman license examination fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

719.

(a) A person shall be deemed qualified to submit an application for a broker’s license if, as shown on the department’s records, the person meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is at least 18 years of age.

(2) Has not been cited for a violation of this article within the preceding two years.

(3) Possesses a working knowledge and understanding of the principles of the yacht brokerage business and profession.

(4) Either has been employed within five years preceding his or her application as a California licensed salesperson for at least one year, has been licensed as a California broker within five years preceding his or her application, has owned and operated a marine business selling new or used yachts for a minimum of three continuous years, or has been employed as a broker or a yacht salesperson in another state where that employment was a primary occupation for a minimum of three continuous years immediately preceding application for a broker’s license in California. Proof of employment as a broker in another state or as an employee of a marine business selling new or used yachts in California shall be in the form of all of the following:

(A) State, if applicable, and federal income tax returns, or a proof of earning statement made by the applicant under penalty of perjury, for the three-year period preceding the filing of the application in California.

(B) If bonded, a statement issued by the applicant’s bonding company that no action has been taken against the bond for fraud or gross misrepresentation for the period for which the bond has been issued.

(C) A copy of all business permits, issued by any state, county, or city agency, which, if applicable, includes the fictitious business name (“dba” or “doing business as”) under which the applicant conducted a yacht or ship brokerage business or a marine business selling new or used yachts in California for the three-year period preceding application for a California broker’s license.

(D) If the applicant conducts a yacht or ship brokerage business in another state that requires broker or salesperson licensing, evidence of a current license issued by that state.

(b) If the applicant is a partnership, then one of the partners of the applicant shall have the foregoing qualifications.

(c) If the applicant is a corporation, then the officer or officers of the corporation to be designated for a license as provided in this article shall have the foregoing qualifications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

720.

The department may require proof as it deems advisable concerning the honesty, truthfulness, and good reputation of the applicant for a broker’s or salesperson’s license or of the officers of any corporation making application before the issuance of a broker’s license. For this purpose, the director may call a hearing in accordance with this article, and at the request of the applicant shall call a hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 508, Sec. 2.5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

721.

(a) In addition to any proof of honesty, truthfulness, and good reputation required of any applicant for a broker’s license, the department shall ascertain by written examination that the applicant, and in case of a partnership or corporation applicant for a broker’s license that an officer or partner thereof through whom it proposes to act as a yacht broker, has all of the following:

(1) Appropriate knowledge of the English language, including reading, writing, and spelling, and of arithmetical computations common to the yacht brokerage business.

(2) An understanding of the principles of the yacht brokerage business and profession, including an understanding of a certificate of ownership, certificate of number, security agreement, bill of sale, and other documents required to register and number, and to transfer title of an undocumented vessel pursuant to the Vehicle Code.

(3) An understanding that transfer of title of a documented vessel shall be performed in accordance with federal law as administered by the United States Coast Guard.

(4) An understanding of maritime and admiralty liens with respect to vessels and the requirements of the Department of Transportation or other federal agency and the United States Coast Guard with respect to documentation, mortgaging, and transferring of title of documented vessels.

(5) An understanding of agency contracts and of types and kinds of listings and deposit receipts with respect to vessels.

(6) A general knowledge of equipment legally required on a yacht.

(7) A general understanding of the obligations between principal and agent, and of the fiduciary relationship between them, and of business ethics pertaining to the business and profession of yacht brokers and yacht salespersons.

(8) A general knowledge of yachts.

(b) (1) If an applicant fails to pass the required examination, the department shall so notify the applicant, may suggest further study, and, upon payment of the required fee, shall schedule a reexamination.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), whenever an applicant fails to pass the written examination on the third attempt to do so, he or she shall be prohibited from retaking the examination for a period of six months from the date of taking the third examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 445, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

722.

The license first issued to a broker shall be for a period of one year. Such license may be renewed for periods of two years upon filing of the required application and payment of the required fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

723.

The license first issued to a salesman shall be for a period of one year. Such license may be renewed for periods of two years. Applicants for renewal of such licenses shall submit a recommendation of the broker who is to be his employer certifying that the applicant is honest, truthful, and of good reputation. The license of a salesman may be renewed upon filing the required application and payment of the renewal fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

724.

(a) An application on the form prescribed by the department for the renewal of a broker or salesman license shall be filed with the department prior to the last day of the period for which a previous license was issued, accompanied by the applicable renewal fee.

(b) Every license not renewed in accordance with subdivision (a) shall expire at midnight of the last day of the period for which it was issued and shall immediately be returned to the department. The license may thereafter be reinstated only upon the filing of an application therefor, accompanied by the payment of the renewal fee required by this article, together with a penalty equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee. No examination shall be required for the reinstatement of a license which has expired solely for nonpayment of the renewal fee as required by this subdivision, subject to Section 726.

(c) An application for the reinstatement of a license which has expired pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be executed under penalty of perjury. The department may refuse to grant reinstatement if the applicant, after the expiration of the license, has performed any act or participated in any transaction for which a license is required by this article or, during the period, has committed any offense or performed any act which would be cause for the suspension or revocation of a license under this article. However, the department shall not refuse to grant reinstatement unless written notice of the grounds of the refusal is mailed or delivered to the applicant.

(d) A salesman’s license which expires other than pursuant to subdivision (b) and under conditions beyond the control of the salesman may be reinstated with another broker on payment of the transfer fee and the renewal fee if applicable and without penalty.

(e) All fees charged and collected under this article shall be paid by the department at least once a month, accompanied by detailed statement, into the State Treasury to the credit of the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(f) All fees charged and collected under this article and paid into the State Treasury are continuously appropriated to carry out the provisions of this article and shall be paid in the manner provided by law.

(g) The department may establish a revolving fund in an amount that it may determine subject to the approval of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 630, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

725.

(a) A temporary license may be issued to a broker or salesperson under the following conditions:

(1) The license shall be issued for a period not to exceed 60 days and only one license shall be issued to each applicant.

(2) An application shall be filed for a temporary license and for a permanent license and at the same time the applicant shall pay all the prescribed fees.

(3) The application shall be in the form and upon the conditions required by the department as provided in this article with respect to a permanent salesperson’s license.

(4) On or before the expiration date of the temporary license, the licensee shall take a written examination for a permanent license. If, without a valid excuse, the licensee fails to appear for the examination at the time prescribed, the examination fee shall be forfeited. In the event of failure to pass the required examination, the department shall notify the applicant, may suggest further study, and upon payment of fees, shall schedule a reexamination.

(5) The applicant shall be at least 18 years of age.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the director may, in their discretion, extend the term of a temporary license or issue a new temporary license to provide an applicant time to comply with Section
 733.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 13.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

726.

(a) A person who fails to renew his license within two years after its expiration may not renew it pursuant to Section 724. Such person may apply and obtain a new license, in which case all of the provisions hereof shall apply as if such person were applying for a license for the first time.

(b) In the event a salesman’s license expires only because that salesman procured a broker’s license or a broker’s license expires only because that broker procured a salesman’s license, either former license may be reinstated under the provisions of Section 724 within two years of the expiration of the latter license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

727.

The department may issue a certificate of convenience to the executor or administrator of the estate of a deceased broker, or if no executor or administrator has been appointed, and until a certified copy of an order making such appointment is filed with the department, to the widow or other heir otherwise entitled to conduct the business of the deceased, permitting such person to act as a broker in the conduct of the business of the estate for a period of 90 days from and after the date of death pending, but not later than, disposal of the business unless such person qualifies by examination for and obtains a permanent broker’s license. The department may extend the certificate of convenience beyond the 90 days on the showing of a just and reasonable cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

728.

(a) Every license issued to a corporation entitles one officer thereof on behalf of the corporation to engage in the business of broker without the payment of any further fee and such officer shall be designated in the application of the corporation for a license. When a broker’s license is issued to a corporation, if it desires any of its officers other than the officer designated by it in the application as provided in this section to act under its license as a broker, it shall procure an additional broker’s license to so employ each of such additional officers. For each officer other than the officer so designated through whom the corporation engages in the business of broker, the appropriate original or renewal fee shall be paid in addition to the fee paid by the corporation. 

(b) Each officer of a corporation through whom it is licensed to act as a broker is, while so employed under such license, a licensed yacht broker, but licensed only to act as such for and on behalf of the corporation as an officer.

(c) An officer of a corporation licensed to act as a broker on behalf of the corporation who desires also to act as a broker or salesman under this article on his own behalf shall procure a separate license in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(d) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke the broker’s license of a corporation as to any officer acting under its license without revoking the license of the corporation. Every corporation making application for a license under this article shall furnish the department with a resolution of its board of directors giving the name of the officer or officers who shall act for and on behalf of the corporation. 

(e) Every corporation licensed under the provisions of this article may by resolution of its board of directors substitute another officer for the one named in the corporation license, provided the person to be substituted qualifies as provided for in this article for a broker’s license and the corporation pays the appropriate original, renewal, or transfer fee as set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

729.

(a) Every license issued to a partnership entitles one partner thereof on behalf of the partnership to engage in the business of yacht broker without the payment of any further fee and such partner shall be designated in the application of the partnership for a license.

(b) When a broker’s license is issued to a partnership, if the partnership desires any partner or partners other than the partner designated by it as provided in this section to act under its license as a broker, the partnership shall procure an additional broker’s license for each of such additional partner or partners. For each partner other than the partner designated through whom the partnership engages in the business of yacht broker, the appropriate original or renewal fee shall be paid in addition to the fee paid by the partnership.

(c) Each partner of a partnership is licensed to act as a broker while such a partner under such license is a licensed broker, but is licensed only to act as such for and on behalf of the partnership.

(d) A partner of a partnership licensed to act as a broker on behalf of the partnership who desires also to act as a broker or salesman under this article on the partner’s own behalf shall procure a separate license in accordance with the provisions of this article.

(e) The department may deny, suspend, or revoke the broker’s license of a partnership as to any partner acting under its license without revoking the license of the partnership.

(f) Every partnership making an application for a license under this article shall set forth in the application the name of the partner who is to act under the license for and on behalf of the partnership.

(g) Every partnership licensed under the provisions of this article may substitute another partner for the one named in the partnership license provided the person to be substituted qualifies as provided for in this article for a broker’s license and the partnership pays the appropriate original, renewal, or transfer fee as set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

729.5.

(a) Any limited liability company licensed by the department as a yacht broker on July 1, 2001, in order to continue to be licensed after that date, shall apply to the department in the form of an individual, partnership, or corporation for a broker’s license on or before the expiration date of its existing license.

(b) On or before February 1, 2001, the department shall provide notice of the requirements imposed by subdivision (a) to any limited liability company licensed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 508, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

730.

(a) Before any broker’s license shall be issued or renewed by the department for any applicant, the applicant shall procure, file, and maintain with the department a good and sufficient bond in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) with a corporate surety duly licensed to do business within the State of California, and conditioned that the applicant shall not practice any fraud or deceit or make any fraudulent or grossly negligent representations that will cause a monetary loss to any person for whom the broker acts under this article.

(b) If any person suffers any loss or damage by reason of any fraud or deceit practiced on that person or any fraudulent or grossly negligent representation made to that person by a licensed broker or the broker’s sales personnel acting for the broker on the broker’s behalf or within the scope of the employment of the sales personnel, which fraud, deceit, or fraudulent or grossly negligent representation is practiced or made with respect to any act of the broker or the sales personnel for which a license is required under this article, that person has a right of action against the broker, the sales personnel, the surety upon the broker’s bond, or the deposit held by the department in accordance with Section 731. If any action is commenced upon the bond, the surety thereunder and the licensed yacht broker with respect to whom the bond has been issued shall immediately notify the department of the action.

(c) If an action is commenced on the bond of a licensed broker, the department may require the filing of an additional bond, and immediately upon the recovery in any action on the bond, the broker described therein shall file a new bond. Failure to file an additional bond within 15 days after notification that an additional bond is required by reason of action against the bond or after recovery on a bond constitutes a failure to comply with this article, in which case the license of the licensed broker whose bond has been canceled or on whose bond recovery has been made may be suspended.

(d) If a broker’s bond is canceled for a reason other than an action being commenced upon it, a new bond shall be filed by the broker. Failure to file a new bond within 30 days after notification that a new bond is required because a previous bond has been canceled constitutes a failure to comply with this article, in which case the license of the licensed broker whose bond has been canceled may be suspended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 445, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

731.

(a) A cash deposit given instead of the bond required by Section 730 shall be held by the department during the life of the license and for a period of four years after the expiration of the license.

(b) If an action is commenced on the cash deposit of a licensed broker pursuant to subdivision (a), the department may require the filing of an additional cash deposit, and immediately, upon the recovery in any action on the deposit, the broker described therein shall file a new cash deposit, equal to the amount specified in the action or recovery, but no greater than the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 730, whichever is less. Failure to file an additional cash deposit within 30 days after notification that an additional cash deposit is required by reason of an action filed against the cash deposit, or after the recovery on a cash deposit, shall constitute a failure to comply with this article, in which case the department may suspend the license of the licensed broker whose cash deposit has been acted on, or where a cash deposit recovery has been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 475, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

732.

The department may deny an application or temporarily suspend or permanently revoke the license of a broker or a salesperson at any time if the licensee, while a broker or salesperson, in performing or attempting to perform any of the acts within the scope of this article, has committed any of the following acts:

(a) Makes any substantial misrepresentation, including a false advertisement or an omission of relevant facts upon which any person has relied.

(b) Makes a false warranty of a character likely to influence, persuade, or induce any person with whom business is transacted under this article.

(c) Engages in a continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or makes false warranties whether or not relied upon by another person.

(d) Acts for the buyer and seller in a transaction without full disclosure of that fact to the buyer and seller and their written consent, except in the case where the selling broker is not the listing broker.

(e) Commingles the money or other property of his or her principal with that of his or her own or uses it for any purpose other than that for which it was entrusted, when the yacht involved in the transaction is not his or her own.

(f) Disburses or uses entrusted money for purposes other than those specifically authorized by Section 714.

(g) Uses coercive or oppressive methods for the purpose of obtaining business or of procuring a listing or participating in a transaction.

(h) Quotes prices different from the gross listing prices without the consent of the seller.

(i) Engages in any other conduct constituting fraud or dishonest dealings, either with respect to his or her principal or other persons.

(j) Permits his or her name to be used for the purpose of assisting any person who is not a licensed broker or salesperson to evade this article.

(k) Demonstrates negligence or incompetence in performing any act for which he or she is required to hold a license.

(l) As a broker licensee, fails to exercise reasonable supervision over the activities of his or her salespersons, or, as the person designated by a corporate or partnership licensee, fails to exercise reasonable supervision and control over the activities of the corporation or partnership for which a yacht and ship broker’s license is required.

(m) Fails to act in accordance with, or disregards, his or her fiduciary duty toward a principal.

(n) Violates any provisions of Section 708, 712, 714, 715, 716, 730, or 731, or the rules and regulations of the department implementing this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 508, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

733.

The department may deny an application or may suspend or revoke the license of a yacht broker or yacht salesperson who, within four years immediately preceding, has committed any of the following acts:

(a) Has procured a license under this article for himself or herself or another by fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit.

(b) Has been convicted of a felony or any crime involving moral turpitude.

(c) Has withheld information from the department that he or she at any time has been convicted of a felony or any crime involving moral turpitude.

(d) Knowingly authorizes, directs, connives, or aids in the publication, advertisement, distribution, or circulation of any material false statements or misrepresentation concerning his or her business or any transaction under this article.

(e) Has acted or conducted himself or herself in a manner that would warrant the denial of his or her application for a broker’s or salesperson’s license pursuant to Section 720.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 508, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

733.5.

(a) The division shall require an applicant for a yacht and ship broker or salesperson license, as those terms are defined in Section 701, to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) The division shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 30.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

734.

(a) The department shall not deny, suspend, or revoke a license granted under this article without a hearing, except the department may suspend a license without a hearing for failure of a broker to maintain a bond as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 730, or for failure of a broker to make available to the department, for inspection, any records, as set forth in Section 735.1.

(b) The department may upon its own motion, and shall upon the verified written complaint of any person which sets forth facts which could be grounds for the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license pursuant to this article, investigate the actions of any broker or salesman whether or not licensed.

(c) The suspension, expiration, or revocation by operation of law of a license issued by the department, or its surrender, whether voluntary or not, does not deprive the department of its authority, during the period in which the license may be renewed, reinstated, or reissued, to institute or continue a disciplinary proceeding against the licensee upon any ground provided by law, to enter an order suspending or revoking the license, or to take any action against the licensee on any other ground provided by law.

(d) A broker whose license has been suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) for failure to make records available to the department for inspection, may request that an expedited hearing be held within 30 days of the suspension before an administrative law judge to appeal the suspension. Upon a showing of good cause to reinstate the license, the broker’s license shall be reinstated. If no good cause is found, the broker’s license may be revoked.

(e) (1) Except as otherwise provided by law, in any order issued in resolution of a disciplinary proceeding under this article, the department may request the administrative law judge to direct a licensee found to have committed a violation or violations of this article to pay a sum not to exceed the reasonable costs of the investigation, prosecution, and enforcement of the case.

For purposes of this paragraph, “reasonable costs” shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Attorney, paralegal, and investigator fees and costs, including salary, travel, and other expenses attributable to hours expended on the case by employees of the office of the Attorney General and the department.

(B) Witness fees, travel, and other expenses paid to or in connection with witnesses to facilitate their attendance and testimony at the disciplinary proceeding or to facilitate their appearance at a deposition, by video or by other means.

(C) Fees and costs attributable to expert review, including, but not limited to, laboratory analysis, physical examination, and psychological examination, whether by an independent expert or a staff member of the department.

(D) Administrative expenses attributable to case preparation and presentation, including, but not limited to, exhibit preparation and document copying, postage, telephone calls, word processing, whether by an independent contractor or a staff member of the department, and costs for obtaining certified public documents.

(2) In the case of a disciplined licensee that is a corporation or a partnership, the order may be made against the licensed corporate entity or licensed partnership.

(3) A declaration under penalty of perjury of the actual costs, or a good faith estimate of costs if the actual costs are not available, signed by the director, and containing sufficient information by which the administrative law judge can determine the costs incurred in connection with the matter and the reasonableness of the costs, shall be prima facie evidence of reasonable costs of investigation, prosecution, and enforcement of the case.

(4) The administrative law judge shall make a proposed finding of the amount of reasonable costs of investigation and prosecution of the case when requested pursuant to paragraph (1). The department may reduce or eliminate the award of any costs by the administrative law judge, and may request the administrative law judge to reconsider his or her decision if the proposed decision does not make a finding on costs as requested pursuant to paragraph (1).

(5) Where an order for recovery of costs is made and timely payment is not made as directed, the department may enforce the order for repayment in any appropriate court. This right of enforcement shall be in addition to any other rights the department may have as to any licensee to pay costs.

(6) In any action for recovery of costs, proof of the department’s decision shall be conclusive proof of the validity of the order of payment and the terms for payment.

(7) The department shall not renew or reinstate the license of any licensee who does not pay all of the costs ordered under this section.

(8) All costs recovered under this section shall be considered a reimbursement for costs incurred and shall be deposited in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(9) Nothing in this section shall preclude the department from including the recovery of the costs of investigation, prosecution, and enforcement of a case in any stipulated settlement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 475, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

735.

(a) Every broker shall maintain a definite place of business in this state as his principal office and may establish other branch offices throughout the state. Every broker maintaining more than one place of business within this state shall procure an additional license for every branch office maintained by him. Every broker shall keep the department informed at all times of the address of his principal and branch offices and any changes of address.

(b) Every broker’s license shall be prominently displayed in the broker’s principal office. The license for each branch office, if any, of such broker shall be prominently displayed in such branch office. Every salesman’s license shall be prominently displayed in the principal office or branch office of the broker in which the business of such salesman is transacted. When a broker or any branch office to which a license was issued, for any reason ceases to be licensed, or when there is a name or address change, such license shall be immediately returned to the department.

(c) Every salesman’s license shall remain in the control of the broker by whom the salesman is employed until the license is canceled or until he leaves the employment of the broker. Immediately upon the salesman’s withdrawal from the employment of the broker, such broker shall return such salesman’s license to the department for cancellation and shall notify the department of the exact date of termination.

(d) Upon the issuance of a license, a pocket card of such size, design, and content as may be determined by the department may be issued without charge to such licensee, which card shall be evidence that the licensee is duly licensed pursuant to this article. When any broker to whom a card is issued ceases for any reason to be licensed as a broker, the card issued to such broker shall be mailed or delivered by the broker to the department for cancellation. When any salesman to whom a card is issued ceases to be a salesman for any reason, the card issued to him shall be mailed or delivered to the department for cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 421.)
-------------------------------------------

735.1.

A licensed broker shall retain, for four years, copies of all listings, deposit receipts, canceled checks, trust records, and other documents executed or obtained by the broker in connection with a transaction for which a broker’s license is required. These records shall be made available to the department for inspection upon request. If the records have not been made available within 30 days of a request by the department, the department may subpoena the requested records. If the records have not been made available within 14 days from the requested day of production on the subpoena, and the director determines that the public may be at risk if the broker continues to be licensed, the department may suspend the broker’s license pursuant to Section 734.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 475, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

735.2.

The department shall accept any electronic record or electronic or digital signature created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means on or after January 1, 2000. A “digital signature” means a signature that complies with the regulations adopted by the Secretary of State relating to digital signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 380, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

736.

(a) The division shall adopt regulations setting forth the fees to be charged and collected under this article. The fees shall be sufficient to reimburse the division for the reasonable costs of implementing this article.

(b) A criminal records investigation fee shall be collected for both a salesperson’s and broker’s license in an amount determined by the Department of Justice, or by any
 other state or federal custodian of criminal records from which the division has requested information concerning an applicant’s criminal record, not to exceed the amount needed to reimburse the division for conducting the criminal records investigation.

(c) The following fees shall apply until such time that the
 division adopts regulations pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Two hundred dollars ($200) for each original broker’s license.

(2) Seventy-five dollars ($75) per year for the renewal of an original broker’s license.

(3) One hundred dollars ($100) for each original salesperson’s license.

(4) Fifty dollars ($50) per year for the renewal of an original salesperson’s license.

(5) Twenty-five dollars ($25) for a salesperson’s temporary license.

(6) Twenty-five dollars ($25) for each license obtained by a broker